District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.52

Rulemaking.

By December 1, 2005, the Mayor shall issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of this part. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 5233, 52 DCR 7503
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5233 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).